Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-531
License; multiple warehouses; license fee; how computed.

Only one license may be required for the operation of all warehouses operated by one warehouse licensee if:

(1) Only one set of books is kept for the warehouses;

(2) Cost slips, scale tickets, warehouse receipts, and checks are issued in one series for grain received or stored in such warehouses; and

(3) The warehouses are operated in conjunction with each other.

If the commission finds that enforcement of the Grain Warehouse Act or the interests of the storers requires that warehouses operated by the same licensee at separate locations be licensed separately, it may require separate licenses for such facilities pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.

The license fee and security required of such warehouse licensee shall be computed on the basis of the separate capacities of each warehouse.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 30.